Maryland, session 2026, HB1522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–202.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1522*

HOUSE BILL 1522
(3) [(i)] “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a
lessee of a motor vehicle [under a lease of 6 months or more].
[(ii) “Owner” does not include a motor vehicle rental or leasing
company or a holder of a special registration plate issued under Title 13, Subtitle 9, Part
III of this article.]
(5) “Traffic control signal monitoring system” means a device with one or
more motor vehicle sensors working in conjunction with a traffic control signal to produce
recorded images of motor vehicles entering an intersection against a red signal indication.
(c) This section applies to a violation of § 21–202(h) of this subtitle at an
intersection monitored by a traffic control signal monitoring system.
(d) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (g)(5) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a traffic control signal monitoring system while being operated in violation of
§ 21–202(h) of this subtitle.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) [(i)] “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a
lessee of a motor vehicle [under a lease of 6 months or more].
[(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle rental or leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.]
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. The State Highway Administration may use speed
monitoring systems on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County and Interstate 695 in Baltimore
County in accordance with this section.

HOUSE BILL 1522 3
3. The Maryland Transportation Authority may use speed
monitoring systems on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in accordance with
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.